California statutes. Probate Code
 the existence of mental incompetence or mental health disorders.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a conservator may make a will on behalf of a conservatee if the conservator has been authorized to do so by a court order pursuant to Section 2580.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 9, Sec. 18.   (AB 46)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

6101.

A will may dispose of the following property:

(a) The testator’s separate property.

(b) The one-half of the community property that belongs to the testator under Section 100.

(c) The one-half of the testator’s quasi-community property that belongs to the testator under Section 101.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6102.

A will may make a disposition of property to any person, including but not limited to any of the following:

(a) An individual.

(b) A corporation.

(c) An unincorporated association, society, lodge, or any branch thereof.

(d) A county, city, city and county, or any municipal corporation.

(e) Any state, including this state.

(f) The United States or any instrumentality thereof.

(g) A foreign country or a governmental entity therein.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6103.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 6100), Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 6110), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 6120), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 6130), Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 6200), and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6300) of this division, and Part 1 (commencing with Section 21101) of Division 11, do not apply where the testator died before January 1, 1985, and the law applicable prior to January 1, 1985, continues to apply where the testator died before January 1, 1985.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 138, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6104.

The execution or revocation of a will or a part of a will is ineffective to the extent the execution or revocation was procured by duress, menace, fraud, or undue influence.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6105.

A will, the validity of which is made conditional by its own terms, shall be admitted to probate or rejected, or denied effect after admission to probate, in conformity with the condition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Execution of Wills [6110. - 6113.]

6110.

(a) Except as provided in this part, a will shall be in writing and satisfy the requirements of this section.

(b) The will shall be signed by one of the following:

(1) By the testator.

(2) In the testator’s name by some other person in the testator’s presence and by the testator’s direction.

(3) By a conservator pursuant to a court order to make a will under Section 2580.

(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the will shall be witnessed by being signed, during the testator’s lifetime, by at least two persons each of whom (A) being present at the same time, witnessed either the signing of the will or the testator’s acknowledgment of the signature or of the will and (B) understand that the instrument they sign is the testator’s will.

(2) If a will was not executed in compliance with paragraph (1), the will shall be treated as if it was executed in compliance with that paragraph if the proponent of the will establishes by clear and convincing evidence that, at the time the testator signed the will, the testator intended the will to constitute the testator’s will.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 53, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

6111.

(a) A will that does not comply with Section 6110 is valid as a holographic will, whether or not witnessed, if the signature and the material provisions are in the handwriting of the testator.

(b) If a holographic will does not contain a statement as to the date of its execution and:

(1) If the omission results in doubt as to whether its provisions or the inconsistent provisions of another will are controlling, the holographic will is invalid to the extent of the inconsistency unless the time of its execution is established to be after the date of execution of the other will.

(2) If it is established that the testator lacked testamentary capacity at any time during which the will might have been executed, the will is invalid unless it is established that it was executed at a time when the testator had testamentary capacity.

(c) Any statement of testamentary intent contained in a holographic will may be set forth either in the testator’s own handwriting or as part of a commercially printed form will.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 710, Sec. 13.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 48 of Ch. 710.)
-------------------------------------------

6111.5.

Extrinsic evidence is admissible to determine whether a document constitutes a will pursuant to Section 6110 or 6111, or to determine the meaning of a will or a portion of a will if the meaning is unclear.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 710, Sec. 14.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 48 of Ch. 710.)
-------------------------------------------

6112.

(a) Any person generally competent to be a witness may act as a witness to a will.

(b) A will or any provision thereof is not invalid because the will is signed by an interested witness.

(c) Unless there are at least two other subscribing witnesses to the will who are disinterested witnesses, the fact that the will makes a devise to a subscribing witness creates a presumption that the witness procured the devise by duress, menace, fraud, or undue influence. This presumption is a presumption affecting the burden of proof. This presumption does not apply where the witness is a person to whom the devise is made solely in a fiduciary capacity.

(d) If a devise made by the will to an interested witness fails because the presumption established by subdivision (c) applies to the devise and the witness fails to rebut the presumption, the interested witness shall take such proportion of the devise made to the witness in the will as does not exceed the share of the estate which would be distributed to the witness if the will were not established. Nothing in this subdivision affects the law that applies where it is established that the witness procured a devise by duress, menace, fraud, or undue influence.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6113.

A written will is validly executed if its execution complies with any of the following:

(a) The will is executed in compliance with Section 6110 or 6111 or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 6200) (California statutory will) or Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 6380) (Uniform International Wills Act).

(b) The execution of the will complies with the law at the time of execution of the place where the will is executed.

(c) The execution of the will complies with the law of the place where at the time of execution or at the time of death the testator is domiciled, has a place of abode, or is a national.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Revocation and Revival [6120. - 6124.]

6120.

A will or any part thereof is revoked by any of the following:

(a) A subsequent will which revokes the prior will or part expressly or by inconsistency.

(b) Being burned, torn, canceled, obliterated, or destroyed, with the intent and for the purpose of revoking it, by either (1) the testator or (2) another person in the testator’s presence and by the testator’s direction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6121.

A will executed in duplicate or any part thereof is revoked if one of the duplicates is burned, torn, canceled, obliterated, or destroyed, with the intent and for the purpose of revoking it, by either (1) the testator or (2) another person in the testator’s presence and by the testator’s direction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6122.

(a) Unless the will expressly provides otherwise, if after executing a will the testator’s marriage is dissolved or annulled, the dissolution or annulment revokes all of the following:

(1) Any disposition or appointment of property made by the will to the former spouse.

(2) Any provision of the will conferring a general or special power of appointment on the former spouse.

(3) Any provision of the will nominating the former spouse as executor, trustee, conservator, or guardian.

(b) If any
 disposition or other provision of a will is revoked solely by this section, it is revived by the testator’s remarriage to the former spouse.

(c) In case of revocation by dissolution or annulment:

(1) Property prevented from passing to a former spouse because of the revocation passes as if the former spouse failed to survive the testator.

(2) Other provisions of the will conferring some power or office on the former spouse shall be interpreted as if the former spouse failed to survive the testator.

(d) For purposes of this section, dissolution or annulment means any dissolution or annulment which would exclude the spouse as a surviving spouse within the meaning of Section 78. A decree of legal separation which does not terminate the status of spouses is
 not a dissolution for purposes of this section.

(e) Except as provided in Section 6122.1, no change of circumstances other than as described in this section revokes a will.

(f) Subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, do not apply to any case where the final judgment of dissolution or annulment of marriage occurs before January 1, 1985. That case is governed by the law in effect prior to January 1, 1985.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 86.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6122.1.

(a) Unless the will expressly provides otherwise, if after executing a will the testator’s domestic partnership is terminated, the termination revokes all of the following:

(1) Any disposition or appointment of property made by the will to the former domestic partner.

(2) Any provision of the will conferring a general or special power of appointment on the former domestic partner.

(3) Any provision of the will nominating the former domestic partner as executor, trustee, conservator, or guardian.

(b) If any disposition or other provision of a will is revoked solely by this section, it is revived by the testator establishing another domestic partnership with the former domestic partner.

(c) In case of revocation by termination of a domestic partnership:

(1) Property prevented from passing to a former domestic partner because of the revocation passes as if the former domestic partner failed to survive the testator.

(2) Other provisions of the will conferring some power or office on the former domestic partner shall be interpreted as if the former domestic partner failed to survive the testator.

(d) This section shall apply only to wills executed on or after January 1, 2002.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 893, Sec. 51.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

6123.

(a) If a second will which, had it remained effective at death, would have revoked the first will in whole or in part, is thereafter revoked by acts under Section 6120 or 6121, the first will is revoked in whole or in part unless it is evident from the circumstances of the revocation of the second will or from the testator’s contemporary or subsequent declarations that the testator intended the first will to take effect as executed.

(b) If a second will which, had it remained effective at death, would have revoked the first will in whole or in part, is thereafter revoked by a third will, the first will is revoked in whole or in part, except to the extent it appears from the terms of the third will that the testator intended the first will to take effect.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6124.

If the testator’s will was last in the testator’s possession, the testator was competent until death, and neither the will nor a duplicate original of the will can be found after the testator’s death, it is presumed that the testator destroyed the will with intent to revoke it. This presumption is a presumption affecting the burden of producing evidence.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Reference to Matters Outside the Will [6130. - 6132.]

6130.

A writing in existence when a will is executed may be incorporated by reference if the language of the will manifests this intent and describes the writing sufficiently to permit its identification.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6131.

A will may dispose of property by reference to acts and events that have significance apart from their effect upon the dispositions made by the will, whether the acts and events occur before or after the execution of the will or before or after the testator’s death. The execution or revocation of a will of another person is such an event.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6132.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision, a will may refer to a writing that directs disposition of tangible personal property not otherwise specifically disposed of by the will, except for money that is common coin or currency and property used primarily in a trade or business. A writing directing disposition of a testator’s tangible personal property is effective if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) An unrevoked will refers to the writing.

(2) The writing is dated and is either in the handwriting of, or signed by, the testator.

(3) The writing describes the items and the recipients of the property with reasonable certainty.

(b) The failure of a writing to conform to the conditions described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) does not preclude the introduction of evidence of the existence of the testator’s intent regarding the disposition of tangible personal property as authorized by this section.

(c) The writing may be written or signed before or after the execution of the will and need not have significance apart from its effect upon the dispositions of property made by the will. A writing that meets the requirements of this section shall be given effect as if it were actually contained in the will itself, except that if any person designated to receive property in the writing dies before the testator, the property shall pass as further directed in the writing and, in the absence of any further directions, the disposition shall lapse.

(d) The testator may make subsequent handwritten or signed changes to any writing. If there is an inconsistent disposition of tangible personal property as between writings, the most recent writing controls.

(e) (1) If the writing directing disposition of tangible personal property omits a statement as to the date of its execution, and if the omission results in doubt whether its provisions or the provisions of another writing inconsistent with it are controlling, then the writing omitting the statement is invalid to the extent of its inconsistency unless the time of its execution is established to be after the date of execution of the other writing.

(2) If the writing directing disposition of tangible personal property omits a statement as to the date of its execution, and it is established that the testator lacked testamentary capacity at any time during which the writing may have been executed, the writing is invalid unless it is established that it was executed at a time when the testator had testamentary capacity.

(f) (1) Concurrent with the filing of the inventory and appraisal required by Section 8800, the personal representative shall also file the writing that directs disposition of the testator’s tangible personal property.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if the writing has not been found or is not available at the time of the filing of the inventory and appraisal, the personal representative shall file the writing no later than 60 days prior to filing the petition for final distribution pursuant to Section 11640.

(g) The total value of tangible personal property identified and disposed of in the writing shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). If the value of an item of tangible personal property described in the writing exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000), that item shall not be subject to this section and that item shall be disposed of pursuant to the remainder clause of the will. The value of an item of tangible personal property that is disposed of pursuant to the remainder clause of the will shall not be counted towards the twenty-five thousand dollar ($25,000) limit described in this subdivision.

(h) As used in this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Tangible personal property” means articles of personal or household use or ornament, including, but not limited to, furniture, furnishings, automobiles, boats, and jewelry, as well as precious metals in any tangible form, such as bullion or coins and articles held for investment purposes. The term “tangible personal property” does not mean real property, a mobilehome as defined in Section 798.3 of the Civil Code, intangible property, such as evidences of indebtedness, bank accounts and other monetary deposits, documents of title, or securities.

(2) “Common coin or currency” means the coins and currency of the United States that are legal tender for the payment of public and private debts, but does not include coins or currency kept or acquired for their historical, artistic, collectable, or investment value apart from their normal use as legal tender for payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 280, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. California Statutory Will [6200. - 6243.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions and Rules of Construction [6200. - 6211.]

6200.

Unless the provision or context clearly requires otherwise, these definitions and rules of construction govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

6201.

“Testator” means a person choosing to adopt a California statutory will.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

6203.

“Executor” means both the person so designated in a California statutory will and any other person acting at any time as the executor or administrator under a California statutory will.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

6204.

“Trustee” means both the person so designated in a California statutory will and any other person acting at any time as the trustee under a California statutory will.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

6205.

“Descendants” mean children, grandchildren, and their lineal descendants of all generations, with the relationship of parent and child at each generation being determined as provided in Section 21115. A reference to “descendants” in the plural includes a single descendant where the context so requires.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 138, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6206.

A reference in a California statutory will to the “Uniform Gifts to Minors Act of any state” or the “Uniform Transfers to Minors Act of any state” includes both the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act of any state and the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act of any state. A reference to a “custodian” means the person so designated in a California statutory will or any other person acting at any time as a custodian under a Uniform Gifts to Minors Act or Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

6207.

Masculine pronouns include the feminine, and plural and singular words include each other, where appropriate.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

6208.

(a) If a California statutory will states that a person shall perform an act, the person is required to perform that act. 

(b) If a California statutory will states that a person may do an act, the person’s decision to do or not to do the act shall be made in the exercise of the person’s fiduciary powers.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

6209.

Whenever a distribution under a California statutory will is to be made to a person’s descendants, the property shall be divided into as many equal shares as there are then living descendants of the nearest degree of living descendants and deceased descendants of that same degree who leave descendants then living; and each living descendant of the nearest degree shall receive one share and the share of each deceased descendant of that same degree shall be divided among his or her descendants in the same manner.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

6210.

“Person” includes individuals and institutions.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

6211.

Reference to a person “if living” or who “survives me” means a person who survives the decedent by 120 hours. A person who fails to survive the decedent by 120 hours is deemed to have predeceased the decedent for the purpose of a California statutory will, and the beneficiaries are determined accordingly. If it cannot be established by clear and convincing evidence that a person who would otherwise be a beneficiary has survived the decedent by 120 hours, it is deemed that the person failed to survive for the required period. The requirement of this section that a person who survives the decedent must survive the decedent by 120 hours does not apply if the application of the 120-hour survival requirement would result in the escheat of property to the state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [6220. - 6227.]

6220.

Any individual of sound mind and over the age of 18 may execute a California statutory will under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

6221.

A California statutory will shall be executed only as follows:

(a) The testator shall complete the appropriate blanks and shall sign the will. 

(b) Each witness shall observe the testator’s signing and each witness shall sign his or her name in the presence of the testator.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

6222.

The execution of the attestation clause provided in the California statutory will by two or more witnesses satisfies Section 8220.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

6223.

(a) There is only one California statutory will. 

(b) The California statutory will includes all of the following: 

(1) The contents of the California statutory will form set out in Section 6240, excluding the questions and answers at the beginning of the California statutory will. 

(2) By reference, the full texts of each of the following: 

(A) The definitions and rules of construction set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 6200).

(B) The property disposition clauses adopted by the testator. If no property disposition clause is adopted, Section 6224 shall apply. 

(C) The mandatory clauses set forth in Section 6241. 

(c) Notwithstanding this section, any California statutory will or California statutory will with trust executed on a form allowed under prior law shall be governed by the law that applied prior to January 1, 1992.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

6224.

If more than one property disposition clause appearing in paragraphs 2 or 3 of a California statutory will is selected, no gift is made. If more than one property disposition clause in paragraph 5 of a California statutory will form is selected, or if none is selected, the residuary estate of a testator who signs a California statutory will shall be distributed to the testator’s heirs as if the testator did not make a will.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

6225.

Only the texts of property disposition clauses and the mandatory clauses shall be considered in determining their meaning. Their titles shall be disregarded.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

6226.

(a) A California statutory will may be revoked and may be amended by codicil in the same manner as other wills. 

(b) Any additions to or deletions from the California statutory will on the face of the California statutory will form, other than in accordance with the instructions, shall be given effect only where clear and convincing evidence shows that they would effectuate the clear intent of the testator. In the absence of such a showing, the court either may determine that the addition or deletion is ineffective and shall be disregarded, or may determine that all or a portion of the California statutory will is invalid, whichever is more likely to be consistent with the intent of the testator. 

(c) Notwithstanding Section 6110, a document executed on a California statutory will form is valid as a will if all of the following requirements are shown to be satisfied by clear and convincing evidence: 

(1) The form is signed by the testator. 

(2) The court is satisfied that the testator knew and approved of the contents of the will and intended it to have testamentary effect. 

(3) The testamentary intent of the maker as reflected in the document is clear.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

6227.

(a) If after executing a California statutory will the testator’s marriage is dissolved or annulled, or the testator’s registered domestic partnership is terminated, the dissolution, annulment, or termination revokes any disposition of property made by the will to the former spouse and any nomination of the former spouse as executor, trustee, guardian, or custodian made by the will. If any disposition or nomination is revoked solely by this section, it is revived by the testator’s remarriage to, or entry into a subsequent registered domestic partnership with, the former spouse.

(b) In case of revocation by dissolution or annulment:

(1) Property prevented from passing to a former spouse because of the revocation passes as if the former spouse failed to survive the testator.

(2) Provisions nominating the former spouse as executor, trustee, guardian, or custodian shall be interpreted as if the former spouse failed to survive the testator.

(c) For purposes of this section, dissolution or annulment means any dissolution or annulment that would exclude the spouse as a surviving spouse within the meaning of Section 78. A decree of legal separation which does not terminate the status of spouses is not a dissolution or annulment for purposes of this section.

(d) This section applies to any California statutory will, without regard to the time when the will was executed, but this section does not apply to any case where the final judgment of
 dissolution or annulment of marriage occurs before January 1, 1985; and, if the final judgment of dissolution or annulment of marriage occurs before January 1, 1985, the case is governed by the law that applied prior to January 1, 1985.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 87.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Form and Full Text of Clauses [6240. - 6243.]

6240.

The following is the California Statutory Will form:
QUESTIONS AND ANSWERS ABOUT THIS CALIFORNIA STATUTORY WILL
The following information, in question and answer form, is not a part of the California Statutory Will. It is designed to help you understand about Wills and to
 decide if this Will meets your needs. This Will is in a simple form. The complete text of each paragraph of this Will is printed at the end of the Will.
1. What happens if I die without a Will? If you die without a Will, what you own (your “assets”) in your name alone will be divided among your spouse, domestic partner, children, or other relatives according to state law. The court will appoint a relative to collect and distribute your assets.

2. What can a Will do for me? In a Will you may designate who will receive your assets at your death. You may designate someone (called an “executor”) to appear before the court, collect your assets, pay your debts and taxes, and distribute your assets as you specify. You may nominate someone (called a “guardian”) to raise your children who
 are under age 18. You may designate someone (called a “custodian”) to manage assets for your children until they reach any age from 18 to 25.

3. Does a Will avoid probate? No. With or without a Will, assets in your name alone usually go through the court probate process. The court’s first job is to determine if your Will is valid.

4. What is community property? Can I give away my share in my Will? If you are married or in a domestic partnership and you or your spouse earned money during your marriage or domestic partnership from work and wages, that money (and the assets bought with it) is community property. Your Will can only give away your one-half of community property. Your Will cannot give away your spouse’s one-half of community property.

5. Does
 my Will give away all of my assets? Do all assets go through probate? No. Money in a joint tenancy bank account automatically belongs to the other named owner without probate. If your spouse, domestic partner, or child is on the deed to your house as a joint tenant, the house automatically passes to him or her. Life insurance and retirement plan benefits may pass directly to the named beneficiary. A Will does not necessarily control how these types of “nonprobate” assets pass at your death.

6. Are there different kinds of Wills? Yes. There are handwritten Wills, typewritten Wills, attorney-prepared Wills, and statutory Wills. All are valid if done precisely as the law requires. You should see a lawyer if you do not want to use this Statutory Will or if you do not understand this form.

7. Who may use this Will? This Will is based on California law. It is designed only for California residents. You may use this form if you are single, married, a member of a domestic partnership, or divorced. You must be age 18 or older and of sound mind.

8. Are there any reasons why I should NOT use this Statutory Will? Yes. This is a simple Will. It is not designed to reduce death taxes or other taxes. Talk to a lawyer to do tax planning, especially if (i) your assets will be worth more than $600,000 or the current amount excluded from estate tax under federal law at your death, (ii) you own business-related assets, (iii) you want to create a trust fund for your children’s education or other purposes, (iv) you own assets in some other state, (v) you want to disinherit your spouse, domestic partner, or descendants, or (vi) you have valuable interests in pension or profit-sharing plans. You should talk to a lawyer who
 knows about estate planning if this Will does not meet your needs. This Will treats most adopted children like natural children. You should talk to a lawyer if you have stepchildren or foster children whom you have not adopted.

9. May I add or cross out any words on this Will? No. If you do, the Will may be invalid or the court may ignore the crossed out or added words. You may only fill in the blanks. You may amend this Will by a separate document (called a codicil). Talk to a lawyer if you want to do something with your assets which is not allowed in this form.

10. May I change my Will? Yes. A Will is not effective until you die. You may make and sign a new Will. You may change your Will at any time, but only by an amendment (called a codicil). You can give away or sell your assets before your death. Your Will only acts
 on what you own at death.

11. Where should I keep my Will? After you and the witnesses sign the Will, keep your Will in your safe deposit box or other safe place. You should tell trusted family members where your Will is kept.

12. When should I change my Will? You should make and sign a new Will if you marry, divorce, or terminate your domestic partnership after you sign this Will. Divorce, annulment, or termination of a domestic partnership automatically cancels all property stated to pass to a former spouse or domestic partner under this Will, and revokes the designation of a former spouse or domestic partner as executor, custodian, or guardian. You should sign a new Will when you have more children, or if your spouse or a child dies, or a domestic partner dies or marries. You may want to change your Will if there is a
 large change in the value of your assets. You may also want to change your Will if you enter a domestic partnership or your domestic partnership has been terminated after you sign this Will.

13. What can I do if I do not understand something in this Will? If there is anything in this Will you do not understand, ask a lawyer to explain it to you.

14. What is an executor? An “executor” is the person you name to collect your assets, pay your debts and taxes, and distribute your assets as the court directs. It may be a person or it may be a qualified bank or trust company.

15. Should I require a bond? You may require that an executor post a “bond.” A bond is a form of insurance to replace assets that may be mismanaged or stolen by
 the executor. The cost of the bond is paid from the estate’s assets.

16. What is a guardian? Do I need to designate one? If you have children under age 18, you should designate a guardian of their “persons” to raise them.

17. What is a custodian? Do I need to designate one? A “custodian” is a person you may designate to manage assets for someone (including a child) who is under the age of 25 and who receives assets under your Will. The custodian manages the assets and pays as much as the custodian determines is proper for health, support, maintenance, and education. The custodian delivers what is left to the person when the person reaches the age you choose (from 18 to 25). No bond is required of a custodian.

18. Should I ask people if they are willing to
 serve before I designate them as executor, guardian, or custodian? Probably yes. Some people and banks and trust companies may not consent to serve or may not be qualified to act.

19. What happens if I make a gift in this Will to someone and that person dies before I do? A person must survive you by 120 hours to take a gift under this Will. If that person does not, then the gift fails and goes with the rest of your assets. If the person who does not survive you is a relative of yours or your spouse, then certain assets may go to the relative’s descendants.

20. What is a trust? There are many kinds of trusts, including trusts created by Wills (called “testamentary trusts”) and trusts created during your lifetime (called “revocable living trusts”). Both kinds of trusts are long-term arrangements
 in which a manager (called a “trustee”) invests and manages assets for someone (called a “beneficiary”) on the terms you specify. Trusts are too complicated to be used in this Statutory Will. You should see a lawyer if you want to create a trust.

21. What is a domestic partner? You have a domestic partner if you have met certain legal requirements and filed a form entitled “Declaration of Domestic Partnership” with the Secretary of State. Notwithstanding Section 299.6 of the Family Code, if you have not filed a Declaration of Domestic Partnership with the Secretary of State, you do not meet the required definition and should not use the section of the Statutory Will form that refers to domestic partners even if you have registered your domestic partnership with another governmental entity. If you are unsure if you have a domestic partner or if your domestic partnership meets the required definition, please contact
 the Secretary of State’s office.
INSTRUCTIONS
1. READ THE WILL. Read the whole Will first. If you do not understand something, ask a lawyer to explain it to you.

2. FILL IN THE BLANKS. Fill in the blanks. Follow the instructions in the form carefully. Do not add any words to the Will (except for filling in blanks) or cross out any words.

3. DATE AND SIGN THE WILL AND HAVE TWO WITNESSES SIGN IT. Date and sign the Will and have two witnesses sign it. You and the witnesses should read and follow the Notice to Witnesses found at the end of this Will.

*You do not need to have this document notarized. Notarization will not fulfill the witness requirement.

* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *

 NOTICE OF INCOMPLETE TEXT: The California Statutory 
 Will appears in the hard-copy publication of the chaptered bill. 
 See Sec. 88, Chapter 50 (pp. 77–82), Statutes of 2016.

* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 88.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Note: See published chaptered bill for complete section text. The California Statutory Will appears on pages 77 to 82 of Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

6241.

The mandatory clauses of the California statutory will form are as follows:

(a) Intestate Disposition. If the testator has not made an effective disposition of the residuary estate, the executor shall distribute it to the testator’s heirs at law, their identities and respective shares to be determined according to the laws of the State of California in effect on the date of the testator’s death relating to intestate succession of property not acquired from a predeceased spouse. 

(b) Powers of Executor.

(1) In addition to any powers now or hereafter conferred upon executors by law, including all powers granted under the Independent Administration of Estates Act, the executor shall have the power to: 

(A) Sell estate assets at public or private sale, for cash or on credit terms. 

(B) Lease estate assets without restriction as to duration. 

(C) Invest any surplus moneys of the estate in real or personal property, as the executor deems advisable. 

(2) The executor may distribute estate assets otherwise distributable to a minor beneficiary to one of the following:

(A) The guardian of
 the minor’s person or estate. 

(B) Any adult person with whom the minor resides and who has the care, custody, or control of the minor. 

(C) A custodian of the minor under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act as designated in the California statutory will form. 
